Illinois, session 104th, HB3415.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-2.5-85 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.5-85)7    Sec. 3-2.5-85. Eligibility for release; determination.8    (a) Every youth committed to the Department of Juvenile 9Justice under Section 5-750 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, 10except those committed for first degree murder, shall be:11        (1) Eligible for aftercare release without regard to 12    the length of time the youth has been confined or whether 13    the youth has served any minimum term imposed.14        (2) Placed on aftercare release on or before his or 15    her 20th birthday or upon completion of the maximum term 16    of confinement ordered by the court under Section 5-710 of 17    the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, whichever is sooner.18        (3) Considered for aftercare release at least 30 days 19    prior to the expiration of the first year of confinement 20    and at least annually thereafter.21    (b) Subsections (d) through (l) of this Section do not 22apply when a youth is released under paragraph (2) of 23subsection (a) of this Section or the youth's release is   HB3415- 2 -LRB104 10268 RLC 20342 b1otherwise required by law or ordered by the court. Youth who 2have been tried as an adult and committed to the Department 3under Section 5-8-6 of this Code are only eligible for 4mandatory supervised release as an adult under Section 3-3-3 5of this Code.6    (c) The Department shall establish a process for deciding 7the date of release on aftercare for every youth committed to 8the Department of Juvenile Justice under Section 5-750 of the 9Juvenile Court Act of 1987. The process shall include 10establishing a target release date upon commitment to the 11Department, the regular review and appropriate adjustment of 12the target release date, and the final release consideration 13at least 30 days prior to the youth's target release date. The 14establishment, adjustment, and final consideration of the 15target release date shall include consideration of the 16following factors:17        (1) the nature and seriousness of the youth's offense;18        (2) the likelihood the youth will reoffend or will 19    pose a danger to the community based on an assessment of 20    the youth's risks, strengths, and behavior; and21        (3) the youth's progress since being committed to the 22    Department.23    The target release date for youth committed to the 24Department for first degree murder shall not precede the 25minimum period of confinement provided in Section 5-750 of the 26Juvenile Court Act of 1987. These youth shall be considered   HB3415- 3 -LRB104 10268 RLC 20342 b1for release upon completion of their minimum term of 2confinement and at least annually thereafter. The target 3release date for youth committed to the Department as a 4Habitual Juvenile Offender or Violent Juvenile Offender under 5Section 5-815 or 5-820 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 shall 6be extended by not less than 12 months. 7    (d) If the youth being considered for aftercare release 8has a petition or any written submissions prepared on his or 9her behalf by an attorney or other representative, the 10attorney or representative for the youth must serve by 11certified mail the State's Attorney of the county where the 12youth was prosecuted with the petition or any written 13submissions 15 days prior to the youth's target release date.14    (e) In making its determination of aftercare release, the 15Department shall consider:16        (1) material transmitted to the Department by the 17    clerk of the committing court under Section 5-750 of the 18    Juvenile Court Act of 1987;19        (2) the report under Section 3-10-2;20        (3) a report by the Department and any report by the 21    chief administrative officer of the institution or 22    facility;23        (4) an aftercare release progress report;24        (5) a medical and psychological report, if available;25        (6) material in writing, or on film, video tape or 26    other electronic means in the form of a recording   HB3415- 4 -LRB104 10268 RLC 20342 b1    submitted by the youth whose aftercare release is being 2    considered;3        (7) material in writing, or on film, video tape or 4    other electronic means in the form of a recording or 5    testimony submitted by the State's Attorney and the victim 6    or a concerned citizen under the Rights of Crime Victims 7    and Witnesses Act; and8        (8) the youth's eligibility for commitment under the 9    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act.10    (f) The prosecuting State's Attorney's office shall 11receive from the Department reasonable written notice not less 12than 30 days prior to the target release date and may submit 13relevant information by oral argument or testimony of victims 14and concerned citizens, or both, in writing, or on film, video 15tape or other electronic means or in the form of a recording to 16the Department for its consideration. The State's Attorney may 17waive the written notice of the target release date at any 18time. Upon written request of the State's Attorney's office, 19provided the request is received within 15 days of receipt of 20the written notice of the target release date, the Department 21shall hear protests to aftercare release. If a State's 22Attorney requests a protest hearing, the committed youth's 23attorney or other representative shall also receive notice of 24the request and a copy of any information submitted by the 25State's Attorney. This hearing shall take place prior to the 26youth's aftercare release. The Department shall schedule the   HB3415- 5 -LRB104 10268 RLC 20342 b1protest hearing date, providing at least 15 days' notice to 2the State's Attorney. If the protest hearing is rescheduled, 3the Department shall promptly notify the State's Attorney of 4the new date.5    (g) The victim of the violent crime for which the youth has 6been sentenced shall receive notice of the target release date 7as provided in paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of Section 4.5 8of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act.9    (g-1) The law enforcement agency of the committing county 10shall receive from the Department of Juvenile Justice 11reasonable written notice not less than 30 days prior to the 12target release date of a youth from the Department of Juvenile 13Justice. 14    (h) The Department shall not release any material to the 15youth, the youth's attorney, any third party, or any other 16person containing any information from the victim or from a 17person related to the victim by blood, adoption, or marriage 18who has written objections, testified at any hearing, or 19submitted audio or visual objections to the youth's aftercare 20release, unless provided with a waiver from that objecting 21party. The Department shall not release the names or addresses 22of any person on its victim registry to any other person except 23the victim, a law enforcement agency, or other victim 24notification system.25    (i) Any recording considered under the provisions of 26paragraph (6) or (7) of subsection (e) or subsection (f) of   HB3415- 6 -LRB104 10268 RLC 20342 b1this Section shall be in the form designated by the 2Department. The recording shall be both visual and aural. 3Every voice on the recording and person present shall be 4identified and the recording shall contain either a visual or 5aural statement of the person submitting the recording, the 6date of the recording, and the name of the youth whose 7aftercare release is being considered. The recordings shall be 8retained by the Department and shall be considered during any 9subsequent aftercare release decision if the victim or State's 10Attorney submits in writing a declaration clearly identifying 11the recording as representing the position of the victim or 12State's Attorney regarding the release of the youth.13    (j) The Department shall not release a youth eligible for 14aftercare release if it determines that:15        (1) there is a substantial risk that he or she will not 16    conform to reasonable conditions of aftercare release;17        (2) his or her release at that time would deprecate 18    the seriousness of his or her offense or promote 19    disrespect for the law; or20        (3) his or her release would have a substantially 21    adverse effect on institutional discipline.22    (k) The Department shall render its release decision and 23shall state the basis therefor both in the records of the 24Department and in written notice to the youth who was 25considered for aftercare release. In its decision, the 26Department shall set the youth's time for aftercare release,   HB3415- 7 -LRB104 10268 RLC 20342 b1or if it denies aftercare release it shall provide for 2reconsideration of aftercare release not less frequently than 3once each year.4    (l) The Department shall ensure all evaluations and 5proceedings under the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act 6are completed prior to any youth's release, when applicable.7    (m) Any youth whose aftercare release has been revoked by 8the Prisoner Review Board under Section 3-3-9.5 of this Code 9may be rereleased to the full aftercare release term by the 10Department at any time in accordance with this Section. Youth 11rereleased under this subsection shall be subject to Sections 123-2.5-70, 3-2.5-75, 3-2.5-80, 3-2.5-90, 3-2.5-95, and 3-3-9.5 13of this Code.14    (n) The Department shall adopt rules regarding the 15exercise of its discretion under this Section.16(Source: P.A. 102-350, eff. 8-13-21.)